apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx
%<sg%>%<def%>:%>нть K ; 
 K ; 

LEXICON _ОШ-SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx
%<sg%>%<def%>:%>%^О2нть K ; 
 K ; 







LEXICON Nouns1_A
 Possessive-NomGen ;

%<cx_abe%>:%>втО1мО1 _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_abl%>:%>дО1 _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_cmp%>:%>%^О2шка _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_prl%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_tra%>:%>%^О2кс _ОШ-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_ill%>:%>%^О2з _ОШ-Possessive-Before-K ;

%<cx_tmp%>%<indef%>:%>не K ;
%<cx_lat%>%<indef%>:%>%^О2в K ;

%<cx_dat%>%<indef%>:%>нень K ;
 DAT-PX ;
%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>%^О2сь K ;
%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>%^О2сь DER/PR_SG ;
%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>%^О2нть K ;
%<sg%>%<cx_dat%>%<def%>:%>%^О2нтень K ;

%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>:%>%^О2нь _КАЛ-Tenses-Obl ;
%<cx_com%>%<indef%>:%>нек K-lak ;

%<dial%>%<cx_ill%>:%>з _ОШ-Possessive-Before-K ;
%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<pxsg3%>:%>зО1 K ;
%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<pxsg3%>:%>зО1 DER/PR_SG ;
%<dial%>%<cx_nom%>%<pxpl1%>:%>нО1к _ЛАК-Tenses-NomSg ;
%<dial%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxpl1%>:%>нО1к _ЛАК-Tenses-Obl ;
%<dial%>%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>сь K ;
%<dial%>%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>сь DER/PR_SG ;
%<dial%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>сть K ;
%<dial%>%<sg%>%<cx_dat%>%<def%>:%>стень K ;


!! Nouns1S_A
!HERE

LEXICON Nouns1S_A_ReqVow
 Possessive-NomGen ;

%<cx_ine%>:%>О1%>сО1 _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_ela%>:%>О1%>стО1 _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_cmp%>:%>%^О2шка _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_ill%>:%>О1%>с K ;

%<cx_lat%>%<indef%>:%>%^О2в K ;


%<cx_ine%>:%>сО1 _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_ela%>:%>стО1 _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_cmp%>:%>шка _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_tra%>:%>%^О2кс _ОШ-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_ill%>:%>с K ;

%<dial%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>%^О2сть K ;
%<dial%>%<sg%>%<cx_dat%>%<def%>:%>%^О2стень K ;

 DAT-PX ;

%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>%^О2сь K ;
%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>%^О2сь DER/PR_SG ;
%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>%^О2нть K ;
%<sg%>%<cx_dat%>%<def%>:%>%^О2нтень K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>:%>%^О2нь _КАЛ-Tenses-Obl ;



LEXICON Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow
%<cx_abl%>:%>дО1 _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_prl%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
%<cx_abe%>:%>втО1мО1 _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

%<dial%>%<cx_dat%>%<pxsg2%>:%>теть K ;
%<dial%>%<cx_dat%>%<pxsg2%>:%>те K ;
%<cx_dat%>%<pxsg2%>:%>тень K ;
%<cx_dat%>%<pxsg1%>:%>нень K ;


%<cx_dat%>:%>нень K ;
%<cx_com%>:%>нек K-lak ;
%<cx_tmp%>:%>не K ;
!!This one would render voiceless "s"
%<dial%>%<cx_ill%>:%>з OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;
%<dial%>%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<pxsg3%>:%>зО1 K ;
%<dial%>%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<pxsg3%>:%>зО1 DER/PR_SG ;
Nouns_Pl ;





LEXICON istja-Gen-Attributes
 K ; !This means that stem is word final 
%<cx_abl%>%<indef%>:%>дО1 K ;
%<indef%>%<cx_gen-indef%>:%>нь _КАЛ-Tenses-Obl ;
%<orth_old%>%<cx_gen-indef%>%<der_се%>:%>н%> N2Dem-SE ;
%<orth_morph%>%<cx_gen-indef%>%<der_се%>:%>нь N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension
%<orth_phon%>%<cx_gen-indef%>%<der_се%>:%>нце _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;


LEXICON chop-Gen-Attributes
 pek-Gen-Attributes ;

LEXICON pek-Gen-Attributes
 K ; !This means that stem is word final 
%<cx_abl%>%<indef%>:%>дО1 K ;
%<indef%>%<cx_gen-indef%>:%>%^О2нь _КАЛ-Tenses-Obl ;
%<orth_old%>%<cx_gen-indef%>%<der_се%>:%>%^О2н%> N2Dem-SE ;
%<orth_morph%>%<cx_gen-indef%>%<der_се%>:%>%^О2нь N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension
%<orth_phon%>%<cx_gen-indef%>%<der_се%>:%>%^О2нце _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;






LEXICON _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill
 _КУДО-Possessives2 ;
%<cx_ill%>:%>з _ОШ-Possessive-Before-K ; !no connecting vowel

LEXICON _КАЛ-Possessives2
 Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

! These are possessor Indices for non-nominative singular
! NonNomSg
LEXICON _ОШ-Possessives2
 Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Possessives2
 Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

LEXICON _КАЛ-Determinatives1
%<der_се%>:%> N2Dem-SE ;
%<orth_phon%>%<der_се%>:%>це _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
 _КАЛ-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON _КИТ-Determinatives1
%<der_се%>:%> N2Dem-SE ;
%<orth_phon%>%<der_се%>:%>це _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
 _КИТ-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON _ЛАК-Determinatives1
 N2Dem-SE ; ! %<der_се%>:%>се _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
%<orth_phon%>%<der_се%>:%>це _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
 _ЛАК-Tenses-Obl ;


LEXICON _КУДО-Determinatives1
 N2Dem-SE ; !%<der_се%>:%>се _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension
%<orth_phon%>%<der_се%>:%>це _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
 _КУДО-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON Dem_
%<pron%>%<dem%>: K ; 

LEXICON DEM_АЛЦЕ
%<sem_spat%>%<der_се%>: _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;

LEXICON letter-F ! this needs fixing front vowel
%<prop%>:%- PROP_КУДО ;

LEXICON letter-B ! this needs fixing back vowel
%<prop%>:%- PROP_КУДО ;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP_КУДО ;
:%: PROP_КУДО ;
:%- PROP_КУДО ;
:%' PROP_КУДО ;


LEXICON _ОШ-Possessive-Before-K-or-K 
 K ;
 _ОШ-Possessive-Before-K ;
!!
!! !!POSSESSIVE marking followed by clitics

!! POSSESSOR INDICES

LEXICON POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3
!! These are possessor indices that can be followed by predicate marking
!! in the present there is no destinction between ScSg3 and ScPl3
!! Possessor indices allowing (1) #, (2) Foc, (3) Der/Pr ()
!!
POSSX4-END ;
OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;
POSSX4-DER/PR-SC3 ;

LEXICON POSSX4-END
!! _КУДО-Possessive-Word-Final
%<pxsg1%>:%>%^О2нЬ2 WORD-END ;
%<pxsg1%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2м WORD-END ;
%<pxsg2%>:%>%^О2тЬ2 WORD-END ;
%<pxsg2%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2нтЬ2 WORD-END ;
%<pxsg3%>:%>%^О2нзО1 WORD-END ;
%<pxpl1%>:%>%^О2нО1к WORD-END ;
%<pxpl2%>:%>%^О2нк WORD-END ;
%<pxpl3%>:%>%^О2ст WORD-END ;

LEXICON POSSX4-END-DAT
%<pxsg1%>:%>%^О2нЬ2 WORD-END ;
%<pxsg1%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2м WORD-END ;
%<pxsg2%>:%>%^О2тЬ2 WORD-END ;
%<pxsg2%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2нтЬ2 WORD-END ;
%<pxsg3%>:%>%^О2нзО1 WORD-END ;
%<pxpl1%>:%>%^О2нО1к WORD-END ;
%<pxpl2%>:%>%^О2нк WORD-END ;
%<pxpl3%>:%>%^О2ст WORD-END ;
%<pxpl3%>:%>%^О2нст WORD-END ;
!! Used with words like тензэ

LEXICON POSSX4-DER/PR-SC3
!! Conjugation
%<pxsg1%>:%>%^О2нЬ2 _КАЛ-Conjugation ;
%<pxsg1%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2м _КАЛ-Conjugation ;
%<pxsg2%>:%>%^О2тЬ2 _КИТ-Conjugation ;
%<pxsg2%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2нтЬ2 _КИТ-Conjugation ;
%<pxsg3%>:%>%^О2нзО1 DER/PR4_OBL-SC3 ;
%<pxpl1%>:%>%^О2нО1к _ЛАК-Conjugation ;
%<pxpl2%>:%>%^О2нк _ЛАК-Conjugation ;
%<pxpl3%>:%>%^О2ст _КИТ-Conjugation ;


LEXICON N-KIN
!! This appears with kindred terminology 
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>:%>%^О2ть%> N2Dem-SE ;
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>:%>%^О2ть N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%>%^О2ть00@U.DECL-NX.SG@ _КИТ-Conjugation ;
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg1%>:%>%^О2нь _КАЛ-Tenses-Obl ;
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>:%>%^О2ть _КИТ-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON Nouns
пире#ёнце:пире#ёнце DEM_АЛЦЕ  "" ;
